tables/en-g3.ctb
# liblouis: English, Grade 3 table
#
# Copyright (C) 2020-2025, Bue Vester-Andersen <bue@vester-andersen.dk>
# Copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team.
# Copyright (C) 2004 ViewPlus Technologies, Inc., www.viewplustech.com
# Copyright (C) 2004 Computers to Help People, Inc., www.chpi.org
# Copyright (C) 2025-2026, Dmitriy Lazarev <dmitriy.braille.numeric674@aleeas.com>


#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

# This table has been developed, mainly on the basis of the rules put
# forth in the publication Key to Grade Three Braille by
# L. W. Rodenberg.  This publication can currently be found on the
# website www.grade3braille.com, together with some manually
# translated text examples, which have also been used heavily in
# creating this table.  As far as I know, there is currently no
# official body maintaining English grade 3 Braille. it is my hope
# that this table may assist in spreading the use of grade 3 for fun
# and faster reading, and, perhaps someday, some official body will
# take grade 3 under its wings.  This table is still somewhat
# experimental. Especially the outline feature of grade 3, i.e. the
# omitting of vowels, is still subject to development. The rules are
# somewhat losely defined, and there is plenty of room for personal
# customization. Creating this table, I have tried not to outline too
# aggressively. The goal has been to make a grade 3 table for general
# use, and which does not require the user to know beforehand, what he
# or she is reading. I am still finding quite a few outlining errors
# and inconsistencies, which sometimes create very strange and funny
# results. Please, note that this table is a forward translation table
# only. It cannot be used for back-translation, i.e. braille input on
# a computer or note-taker.

# This table was created using en-GB-g2.ctb as a template.  In my
# opinion, it resembles grade 3 better than UEB, e.g. with more
# contractions, and the omission of capital marks. Since grade 3 is
# supposed to use grade 2 as the base, I have included all modern
# grade 2 contractions that I am aware off, including those which were
# not in use when grade 3 was first invented. The sequencing feature
# of grade 3, i.e. the omission of space between some words, is
# handled by inserting various braille markers in pass 1. These
# markers consist of dot patterns with virtual dots, and they are then
# processed and removed in subsequent passes. The outlining feature,
# i.e. the omission of some vowels, is a very flexible tool, and there
# is lots of room within the rules for a personal style. Outlining is
# handled using the nocross opcode and hyphenation patterns created
# for this specific purpose. This technique is also used to control
# cases where word contractions could theoretically be used as part of
# other words, e.g. "hear" in "heart", "over in "discover" or "other"
# in "psychotherapy". It is not always clear from the rules, when
# these imbedded word contractions could or should be used.

### Table Metadata

#-name: English contracted grade 3
#-index-name: English, contracted, grade 3
#-display-name: English grade 3 contracted braille

#+locale: en
#+type: literary
#+contraction: full
#+grade: 3
#+dots: 6
#+direction: forward
#-has-nocross: yes

include text_nabcc.dis All display opcodes

include en-chardefs.cti All character definition opcodes

# # special unicode signs to be used as sequence markers
sign \xf000 9 # Ordinary one-celled word sign open
sign \xf001 19 # Ordinary one-celled word sign close
sign \xf002 29 # Large sign (and/for/of/with open
sign \xf003 129 # Large sign close
sign \xf004 39 # Lower1 am/be/is/are/been/were/his/was open
sign \xf005 139 # Lower1 close
sign \xf006 239 # Lower2 (enough/in/come) open
sign \xf007 1239 # Lower2 close
sign \xf008 49 # Lower# (to/into/by) open
sign \xf009 149 # Lower3 close
sign \xf00a 249 # Two-celled word sign open
sign \xf00b 1249 # Two-celled word sign close
sign \xf00c 349 # Two-celled word sign used as partword
sign \xf00d 1349 # Lower prefix (be/com/con/dis)
sign \xf00e 2349 # Other prefix
sign \xf00f 12349 # "keep away" (prevent sequencing)
sign \xf010 59 # Lower1 close (no join)
sign \xf011 56f # Letsign
sign \xf012 6f # Dummy capsletter sign


attribute marker \xf000\xf001\xf002\xf003\xf004\xf005\xf006\xf007
attribute marker \xf008\xf009\xf00a\xf00b\xf00c\xf00d\xf00e\xf00f
attribute marker \xf010
attribute wordsignOpen \xf000\xf002\xf004\xf006\f008\xf00a
attribute wordsignClose \xf001\xf003\xf005\xf007\xf009\xf00b\xf010
attribute lowerOpen \xf004\xf006\xf008
attribute lowerClose \xf005\xf007\xf009\xf010
attribute prefix \xf00d\xf00e


hyphen 	\x2010 36		 # 8208			hyphen

punctuation \x2212 36
noback always \x2212 36
always \s\x2212\s 36-36
midnum \x2013 36-3456
always	\x2013 56-36		 # 8211		smart minus sign


# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand
letsign 56f
capsletter 6f
begcapsword 6f-6f
endcapsword 6f-3
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold

begemphword italic 12349-46
endemphword italic 46-3
begemphphrase italic 12349-46-46
endemphphrase italic before 12349-46
lenemphphrase italic 4

begemphword underline 12349-46
endemphword underline 46-3
begemphphrase underline 12349-46-46
endemphphrase underline before 12349-46
lenemphphrase underline 4

begemphword bold 12349-46
endemphword bold 46-3
begemphphrase bold 12349-46-46
endemphphrase bold before 12349-46
lenemphphrase bold 4

begcomp 6-346
endcomp 6-346

# the decimal digits
include litdigits6Dots.uti

endnum st 34
endnum nd 1345-145
endnum rd 1235-145
endnum th 1456
endnum 's 3-234

# noletsignafter is apparently broken
noletsignafter .'
#noback pass2 @256-56f @256
noback pass2 @3-56f @3
noback pass2 @1249[@3456] @0*
noback pass2 @129[@3456] @0*
noback pass2 @19[@3456] @0*
noback pass2 @129[@23] *
noback pass2 @19[@23]  *
noback pass2 @129[@25] *
noback pass2 @19[@25]  *
noback pass2 @129[@256] *
noback pass2 @19[@256]  *
noback pass2 @19-0-29 @19-29

# Lower2 words (in/enough/come) must retain a preceding space; they never sequence with a preceding word sign.
noback pass2 %wordsignClose[@239] @0-239

# Contractions
contraction ie
word i.e. 24-256-15-256
contraction ok
word o.k. 135-256-13-256
contraction eg

# Roman Numerals
contraction ii
contraction iii
contraction iv
contraction vi
contraction vii
contraction viii
contraction ix
contraction xi
contraction xii
contraction xiii


# punctuation
prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
always \s-" 36-36-356
always \s-” 36-36-356
always ..." 3-3-3-356
always …" 3-3-3-356
always ...” 3-3-3-356
always …” 3-3-3-356
always ?" 236-356
word " 236
begnum ' 3
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 356-3
postpunc '' 356
postpunc ''' 356-3-356

midnum , 2
noback always , 2
midnum . 46
always . 256
always ; 23
midnum : 25
always : 25
#endnum ! 6-235
noback always ! 235
begnum # 4
always # 4-3456
midnum / 456-34-3456
always / 456-34
always // 345
noback always ? 236
endnum % 0-25-1234
always % 25-1234
midnum ^ 346-3456
always ^ 456-126
always ~ 4-156
always & 4-12346
midnum * 0-56-236-3456
always * 35-35
repeated *** 35-35-0-35-35-0-35-35
prepunc ( 2356
postpunc ) 2356
begword ( 2356
endword ) 2356
always [ 6-2356
always ] 2356-3
always { 46-2356
always } 46-2356
prepunc `` 236
begword @ 4-2346
noback always @ 2346
always \\ 12567 # Since Computer Braille backslash has a dot 7.
always | 5-123
repeated \x00a0 0 no break space
repeated --- 36-36-36

repeated ___ 46-46-46

repeated ::: 25-25-25

repeated === 56-2356-56-2356-56-2356
repeated ~~~ 4-156-4-156-4-156
# A spaced ASCII hyphen is a single cell 36. Match the spaces as context so they remain literal.
match %_ - %_ 36
# Preserve the existing special handling before literal "com", but retain both spaces and use a single-cell hyphen.
always \s-\scom 0-36-0-14-135-134
always ... 3-3-3
always .\s.\s. 3-3-3 . . .
# always  \x2026 3-3-3 # 8230			MS Word smart ellipsis

# the hyphen
always \s–\s 36-36
#always - 36
repeated ­­­ 36-36-36
always \s­\s 36-36
midword - 36
# Do not use joinword for ASCII dash: a following literal space must not be swallowed.
begword - 36
hyphen - 36



# mathematical symbols
#decpoint . 2 # removed to sort out translations such as p.11
noback always < 246
joinword = 56-2356
joinnum = 56-2356
noback always > 135
midnum + 0-56-235-3456
begnum + 56-235
joinnum + 56-235
joinword + 56-235
midnum - 36-3456 removed for verse references
midnum \x2013 36
#always - 36
joinnum × 56-236
joinword × 56-236
midnum ÷ 0-56-256-3456 division sign
joinnum ÷ 56-256
joinword ÷ 56-256
begnum £ 123
always £ 4-123 pounds

# other special characters
always © 45-14 copyright
sign ™ 45-2345 trademark
sign ® 45-1235 registered
always ¶ 1234-345 paragraph
always § 234-3 section
noback always ° 356 degrees
begnum $ 256
always $ 4-256
always ¢ 4-14 cents
sign € 4-15	euro
always € 4-15	euro
always ¥ 4-13456 yen
always µ 2-134 mu

# special character sequences
literal :// URLs
literal www.

literal .com
literal .edu
literal .gov
literal .mil
literal .net
literal .org
literal .doc
compbrl .xml
compbrl .xsl
literal .htm
literal .html
literal .tex
literal .txt
literal .gif
literal .jpg
literal .png
literal .wav
literal .tar
literal .zip
literal .uk

# include countries.cti

# Make all quotes and apostrophes uniform
attribute quotes \x201e\x0084\x201c\x0093\x201d\x0094\x00ab\x00bb 
noback correct %quotes "\""
attribute apostrophes `\x201a\x0082\x2039\x008b\x2018\x0091\x2019\x0092\x203a\x009b\x00b4
noback correct %apostrophes "'"

# Grade 3 numbers
# Since there are some instances where dots 7 and 8 are used in this table such as the backslash in Computer Braille, it would allow 10 to be represented by 2457
# to distinguish it from 0 which is still 245.
